Utah statutes.
17-20-1.   County clerk -- District court clerk duties.
The county clerk is the clerk of the legislative body of the county.  The
clerk shall act as clerk of the district court in secondary counties of the
state district court administrative system and those counties not in the
system, and shall perform the duties listed in Section 78A-5-108.
